Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-542
Sanitary district; activities; discontinuance; trustees subsequently elected; powers and duties.

Trustees elected subsequent to the adoption of the resolution or the petition provided for in section 31-536 shall be bound thereby, and shall surrender their office as provided for in section 31-538.

Laws 1941, c. 56, § 7, p. 257;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 31-636;

R.S.1943, § 31-542.